Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1226
Copy or abstract of sections; post; furnish employers.

Every person subject to the provisions of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 shall keep an abstract or copy of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 posted in a conspicuous place in or about the premises wherein any employee is employed. Employers shall be furnished copies of abstracts of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 by the state on request without charge.

Laws 1969, c. 389, § 8, p. 1369.